Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1120.20
Joint use of communications; departments; agencies; cooperation.

Personnel of all departments, offices, and agencies of state government shall cooperate and assist to the maximum extent possible in the consolidation, redistribution, and joint use of communications systems and services used by and under the direction of such departments or agencies and shall coordinate all communications services or facilities procurement through the Director of Communications.

Laws 1967, c. 572, § 7, p. 1883;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-1120.07;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 11.